Mississippi, session 2026, SB2091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 23-15-191, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 23-15-191.  The first primary shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of * * * August June preceding any regular or general election; and the second primary shall be held four (4) weeks thereafter.  The candidate that receives a majority of the votes cast in the election shall be the party nominee.  If no candidate receives a majority vote at the election, then the two (2) candidates who receive the highest number of votes shall have their names placed on the ballot for the second primary election to be held four (4) weeks later.  The candidate who receives the most votes in the second primary election shall be the party nominee.  However, if no candidate receives a majority vote at the first primary, and there is a tie in the election of those receiving the next highest vote, then those candidates receiving the next highest vote and the candidate receiving the highest vote shall have their names placed on the ballot for the second primary election to be held four (4) weeks later, and whoever receives the most votes cast in the second primary election shall be the party nominee. SECTION 2.  Section 21-9-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 21-9-17.  Except as otherwise provided, all candidates for mayor and councilmen, or any of them, to be voted for at any general or special municipal election, shall be nominated by party primary election, and no other name or names shall be placed on the official ballot at such general or special election than those selected in the manner prescribed herein.  Such primary election or elections, shall be held not less than ten (10), nor more than * * * thirty (30) one hundred sixty (160) days, preceding the general or special election, and such primary election or elections shall be held and conducted in the manner as near as may be as is provided by law for state and county primary elections. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.